Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8109
Changes made to act; applicability.

The changes made to the Nebraska Protection in Annuity Transactions Act by Laws 2021, LB22, shall apply to solicitations occurring on and after January 1, 2022.

Laws 2012, LB887, § 29;

Laws 2021, LB22, § 7.